Utah statutes.
49-13-202.   Participation of employers -- Limitations -- Exclusions --
Admission requirements -- Nondiscrimination requirements -- Service credit
purchases.
(1) (a)  Unless excluded under Subsection (2), an employer is a participating
employer and may not withdraw from participation in this system.
(b)  In addition to their participation in this system, participating
employers may provide or participate in any additional public or private
retirement, supplemental or defined contribution plan, either directly or
indirectly, for their employees.
(2)  The following employers may be excluded from participation in this
system:
(a)  an employer not initially admitted or included as a participating
employer in this system prior to January 1, 1982 if:
(i)  the employer elects not to provide or participate in any type of private
or public retirement, supplemental or defined contribution plan, either
directly or indirectly, for its employees, except for Social Security; or
(ii)  the employer offers another collectively bargained retirement benefit
and has continued to do so on an uninterrupted basis since that date;
(b)  an employer that is a charter school sponsored by the State Board of
Education or a school district that makes an election of nonparticipation in
accordance with Section 53A-1a-512 unless the charter school makes a one-time,
irrevocable retraction of the election of nonparticipation in accordance with
Subsection 53A-1a-512(9); or
(c)  an employer that is a hospital created as a special service district
under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service District Act, that makes an
election of nonparticipation in accordance with Subsection (5).
(3)  If an employer that may be excluded under Subsection (2)(a)(i) elects at
any time to provide or participate in any type of public or private
retirement, supplemental or defined contribution plan, either directly or
indirectly, except for Social Security, the employer shall be a participating
employer in this system.
(4) (a)  An employer may, by resolution of its governing body, apply for
admission to this system.
(b)  Upon approval of the resolution by the board, the employer is a
participating employer in this system and is subject to this title.
(5) (a)  Until June 30, 2009, a employer that is a hospital created as a
special service district under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service District
Act, may make an election of nonparticipation as an employer for retirement
programs under this chapter.
(b)  An election provided under Subsection (5)(a):
(i)  is a one-time election made no later than the time specified under
Subsection (5)(a);
(ii)  shall be documented by a resolution adopted by the governing body of the
special service district;
(iii)  is irrevocable; and
(iv)  applies to the special service district as the employer and to all
employees of the special service district.
(c)  The governing body of the special service district may offer employee
benefit plans for its employees:
(i)  under Title 49, Chapter 20, Public Employees' Benefit and Insurance
Program Act; or
(ii)  under any other program.
(6)  If a participating employer purchases service credit on behalf of regular
full-time employees for service rendered prior to the participating employer's
admission to this system, the service credit shall be purchased in a
nondiscriminatory manner on behalf of all current and former regular full-time
employees who were eligible for service credit at the time service was
rendered.
